Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2402.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is hereby established the blue ribbon commission
on higher education. The purpose of the commission shall be to study,
discuss and make recommendations on higher education in the state of
Kansas.
(b) The commission shall consist of 17 members as follows:
(1) One member appointed by the chairperson of the state board of
regents;
(2) one member appointed by the governor;
(3) one member of the majority party of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(4) one member of the majority party of the house of representatives
appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives;
(5) one member of the minority party of the house of representatives
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives;
(6) one member of the majority party of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate;
(7) one member of the majority party of the senate appointed by the
majority leader of the senate;
(8) one member of the minority party of the senate appointed by the
minority leader of the senate;
(9) one member to represent the regional universities jointly
appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(10) one member to represent the big three universities jointly
appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(11) one member appointed by the Kansas association of technical
colleges;
(12) one member appointed by the Kansas association of community

HB 2402 2
colleges;
(13) one member who is a student attending a postsecondary
educational institution appointed by the speaker pro tem of the house of
representatives;
(14) one member who is the parent of a student attending a
postsecondary educational institution appointed by the vice president of
the senate;
(15) one member who is a higher education expert jointly appointed
by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(16) one member of the public appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and
(17) one member of the public appointed by the president of the
senate.
(c) The term of members of the commission shall expire on January
1, 2027. Any vacancy in members of the commission shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment. The chairperson of the
commission shall be jointly appointed by the president of the senate and
the speaker of the house of representatives.
(d) The commission may meet at any time, at any place within the
state and through any means upon call of the chairperson. All actions taken
by the commission shall be made by motion and adopted by a majority of
those present when there is a quorum. A quorum of the commission is 9
members.
(e) Members of the commission attending meetings authorized by the
commission shall be paid amounts for expenses, mileage and subsistence
as provided in K.S.A. 75-3223(e), and amendments thereto, by the state
board of regents.
(f) The commission shall study, discuss and make recommendations
on the following:
(1) Long-term goals and priorities for higher education;
(2) governing structure, financing, cost, savings and consolidation of
state board of regents schools, community colleges and technical colleges;
(3) accessibility and affordability of higher education;
(4) strengths and weaknesses of higher education and postsecondary
educational institutions;
(5) strategies for enrollment and degree completion; and
(6) strategies for right-sizing and streamlining higher education for
the future with a student focus.
(g) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the commission shall submit to
the legislature a preliminary report on the commission's findings and
recommendations for higher education in the state of Kansas.
(2) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall submit to the

HB 2402 3
legislature a final report on the commission's findings and
recommendations for higher education in the state of Kansas.
(h) The staff of the state board of regents, office of revisor of statutes,
the legislative research department and the division of legislative
administrative services shall provide assistance as may be requested by the
commission.
(i) As used in this section, "postsecondary educational institution"
means any public university, municipal university, community college,
technical college and institute of technology.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.